Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-3006
Digital asset depository institution; subject to other provisions of law.

A digital asset depository institution shall be subject to the Interstate Branching and Merger Act, the Nebraska Bank Holding Company Act of 1995, and Chapter 8, articles 6, 8, 13, 14, 15, 16, 19, 20, 25, 26, and 29 unless otherwise limited or excluded or the context otherwise requires.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 6.

Interstate Branching and Merger Act, see section 8-2101.

Nebraska Bank Holding Company Act of 1995, see section 8-908.